scripts/ru_lemmas/pos/v.lexd
андӣдоw<v>:отставать<v>
andīzd<v>:отставать<v>
андӣзд<v>:отставать<v>
andīc<v>:отставать<v>
андӣц<v>:отставать<v>
andīӡd<v>:отставать<v>
андӣӡд<v>:отставать<v>
andūyd<v>:отставать<v>
андӯйд<v>:отставать<v>
andūyǰ<v>:отставать<v>
андӯйҷ<v>:отставать<v>
indiz<v>:отставать<v>
индиз<v>:отставать<v>
indoyd<v>:отставать<v>
индойд<v>:отставать<v>
indoyǰ<v>:отставать<v>
индойҷ<v>:отставать<v>
indīdow<v>:отставать<v>
индӣдоw<v>:отставать<v>
indīzd<v>:отставать<v>
индӣзд<v>:отставать<v>
indīc<v>:отставать<v>
индӣц<v>:отставать<v>
indūyd<v>:отставать<v>
индӯйд<v>:отставать<v>
indūyǰ<v>:отставать<v>
индӯйҷ<v>:отставать<v>
yindiz<v>:отставать<v>
йиндиз<v>:отставать<v>
andiz<v>:увеличиваться<v>
андиз<v>:увеличиваться<v>
andiӡ<v>:увеличиваться<v>
андиӡ<v>:увеличиваться<v>
andoyd<v>:увеличиваться<v>
андойд<v>:увеличиваться<v>
andoyǰ<v>:увеличиваться<v>
андойҷ<v>:увеличиваться<v>
andīdow<v>:увеличиваться<v>
андӣдоw<v>:увеличиваться<v>
andīzd<v>:увеличиваться<v>
андӣзд<v>:увеличиваться<v>
andīc<v>:увеличиваться<v>
андӣц<v>:увеличиваться<v>
andīӡd<v>:увеличиваться<v>
андӣӡд<v>:увеличиваться<v>
andūyd<v>:увеличиваться<v>
андӯйд<v>:увеличиваться<v>
andūyǰ<v>:увеличиваться<v>
андӯйҷ<v>:увеличиваться<v>
indiz<v>:увеличиваться<v>
индиз<v>:увеличиваться<v>
indoyd<v>:увеличиваться<v>
индойд<v>:увеличиваться<v>
indoyǰ<v>:увеличиваться<v>
индойҷ<v>:увеличиваться<v>
indīdow<v>:увеличиваться<v>
индӣдоw<v>:увеличиваться<v>
indīzd<v>:увеличиваться<v>
индӣзд<v>:увеличиваться<v>
indīc<v>:увеличиваться<v>
индӣц<v>:увеличиваться<v>
indūyd<v>:увеличиваться<v>
индӯйд<v>:увеличиваться<v>
indūyǰ<v>:увеличиваться<v>
индӯйҷ<v>:увеличиваться<v>
yindiz<v>:увеличиваться<v>
йиндиз<v>:увеличиваться<v>
andiz<v>:вырастать<v>
андиз<v>:вырастать<v>
andiӡ<v>:вырастать<v>
андиӡ<v>:вырастать<v>
andoyd<v>:вырастать<v>
андойд<v>:вырастать<v>
andoyǰ<v>:вырастать<v>
андойҷ<v>:вырастать<v>
andīdow<v>:вырастать<v>
андӣдоw<v>:вырастать<v>
andīzd<v>:вырастать<v>
андӣзд<v>:вырастать<v>
andīc<v>:вырастать<v>
андӣц<v>:вырастать<v>
andīӡd<v>:вырастать<v>
андӣӡд<v>:вырастать<v>
andūyd<v>:вырастать<v>
андӯйд<v>:вырастать<v>
andūyǰ<v>:вырастать<v>
андӯйҷ<v>:вырастать<v>
indiz<v>:вырастать<v>
индиз<v>:вырастать<v>
indoyd<v>:вырастать<v>
индойд<v>:вырастать<v>
indoyǰ<v>:вырастать<v>
индойҷ<v>:вырастать<v>
indīdow<v>:вырастать<v>
индӣдоw<v>:вырастать<v>
indīzd<v>:вырастать<v>
индӣзд<v>:вырастать<v>
indīc<v>:вырастать<v>
индӣц<v>:вырастать<v>
indūyd<v>:вырастать<v>
индӯйд<v>:вырастать<v>
indūyǰ<v>:вырастать<v>
индӯйҷ<v>:вырастать<v>
yindiz<v>:вырастать<v>
йиндиз<v>:вырастать<v>
andiz<v>:расти<v>
андиз<v>:расти<v>
andiӡ<v>:расти<v>
андиӡ<v>:расти<v>
andoyd<v>:расти<v>
андойд<v>:расти<v>
andoyǰ<v>:расти<v>
андойҷ<v>:расти<v>
andīdow<v>:расти<v>
андӣдоw<v>:расти<v>
andīzd<v>:расти<v>
андӣзд<v>:расти<v>
andīc<v>:расти<v>
андӣц<v>:расти<v>
andīӡd<v>:расти<v>
андӣӡд<v>:расти<v>
andūyd<v>:расти<v>
андӯйд<v>:расти<v>
andūyǰ<v>:расти<v>
андӯйҷ<v>:расти<v>
indiz<v>:расти<v>
индиз<v>:расти<v>
indoyd<v>:расти<v>
индойд<v>:расти<v>
indoyǰ<v>:расти<v>
индойҷ<v>:расти<v>
indīdow<v>:расти<v>
индӣдоw<v>:расти<v>
indīzd<v>:расти<v>
индӣзд<v>:расти<v>
indīc<v>:расти<v>
индӣц<v>:расти<v>
indūyd<v>:расти<v>
индӯйд<v>:расти<v>
indūyǰ<v>:расти<v>
индӯйҷ<v>:расти<v>
yindiz<v>:расти<v>
йиндиз<v>:расти<v>
andiz<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
андиз<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
andiӡ<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
андиӡ<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
andoyd<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
андойд<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
andoyǰ<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
андойҷ<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
andīdow<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
андӣдоw<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
andīzd<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
андӣзд<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
andīc<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
андӣц<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
andīӡd<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
андӣӡд<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
andūyd<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
андӯйд<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
andūyǰ<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
андӯйҷ<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
indiz<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
индиз<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
indoyd<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
индойд<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
indoyǰ<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
индойҷ<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
indīdow<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
индӣдоw<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
indīzd<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
индӣзд<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
indīc<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
индӣц<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
indūyd<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
индӯйд<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
indūyǰ<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
индӯйҷ<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
yindiz<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
йиндиз<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
andiz<v>:начинаться<v>
андиз<v>:начинаться<v>
andiӡ<v>:начинаться<v>
андиӡ<v>:начинаться<v>
andoyd<v>:начинаться<v>
андойд<v>:начинаться<v>
andoyǰ<v>:начинаться<v>
андойҷ<v>:начинаться<v>
andīdow<v>:начинаться<v>
андӣдоw<v>:начинаться<v>
andīzd<v>:начинаться<v>
андӣзд<v>:начинаться<v>
andīc<v>:начинаться<v>
андӣц<v>:начинаться<v>
andīӡd<v>:начинаться<v>
андӣӡд<v>:начинаться<v>
andūyd<v>:начинаться<v>
андӯйд<v>:начинаться<v>
andūyǰ<v>:начинаться<v>
андӯйҷ<v>:начинаться<v>
indiz<v>:начинаться<v>
индиз<v>:начинаться<v>
indoyd<v>:начинаться<v>
индойд<v>:начинаться<v>
indoyǰ<v>:начинаться<v>
индойҷ<v>:начинаться<v>
indīdow<v>:начинаться<v>
индӣдоw<v>:начинаться<v>
indīzd<v>:начинаться<v>
индӣзд<v>:начинаться<v>
indīc<v>:начинаться<v>
индӣц<v>:начинаться<v>
indūyd<v>:начинаться<v>
индӯйд<v>:начинаться<v>
indūyǰ<v>:начинаться<v>
индӯйҷ<v>:начинаться<v>
yindiz<v>:начинаться<v>
йиндиз<v>:начинаться<v>
andůz<v>:будить<v>
анду̊з<v>:будить<v>
andůzd<v>:будить<v>
анду̊зд<v>:будить<v>
andůzdow<v>:будить<v>
анду̊здоw<v>:будить<v>
andůzǰ<v>:будить<v>
анду̊зҷ<v>:будить<v>
indůz<v>:будить<v>
инду̊з<v>:будить<v>
indůzd<v>:будить<v>
инду̊зд<v>:будить<v>
indůzdow<v>:будить<v>
инду̊здоw<v>:будить<v>
indůzǰ<v>:будить<v>
инду̊зҷ<v>:будить<v>
ancāv<v>:шить<v>
анцāв<v>:шить<v>
ancāven<v>:шить<v>
анцāвен<v>:шить<v>
ancāvum<v>:шить<v>
анцāвум<v>:шить<v>
ancām<v>:шить<v>
анцāм<v>:шить<v>
anca<v>:шить<v>
анца<v>:шить<v>
ancavet<v>:шить<v>
анцавет<v>:шить<v>
ancen<v>:шить<v>
анцен<v>:шить<v>
ancīvd<v>:шить<v>
анцӣвд<v>:шить<v>
ancīvdow<v>:шить<v>
анцӣвдоw<v>:шить<v>
ancūvd<v>:шить<v>
анцӯвд<v>:шить<v>
ancūvǰ<v>:шить<v>
анцӯвҷ<v>:шить<v>
incāv<v>:шить<v>
инцāв<v>:шить<v>
incāven<v>:шить<v>
инцāвен<v>:шить<v>
incāvum<v>:шить<v>
инцāвум<v>:шить<v>
incām<v>:шить<v>
инцāм<v>:шить<v>
inca<v>:шить<v>
инца<v>:шить<v>
incavet<v>:шить<v>
инцавет<v>:шить<v>
incen<v>:шить<v>
инцен<v>:шить<v>
incīvd<v>:шить<v>
инцӣвд<v>:шить<v>
incīvdow<v>:шить<v>
инцӣвдоw<v>:шить<v>
incūvd<v>:шить<v>
инцӯвд<v>:шить<v>
incūvǰ<v>:шить<v>
инцӯвҷ<v>:шить<v>
anǰafc<v>:начинаться<v>
анҷафц<v>:начинаться<v>
anǰafct<v>:начинаться<v>
анҷафцт<v>:начинаться<v>
anǰafctow<v>:начинаться<v>
анҷафцтоw<v>:начинаться<v>
anǰovd<v>:начинаться<v>
анҷовд<v>:начинаться<v>
anǰovǰ<v>:начинаться<v>
анҷовҷ<v>:начинаться<v>
anǰīvӡ<v>:начинаться<v>
анҷӣвӡ<v>:начинаться<v>
anǰūvd<v>:начинаться<v>
анҷӯвд<v>:начинаться<v>
anǰūvǰ<v>:начинаться<v>
анҷӯвҷ<v>:начинаться<v>
anǰūvǰ<v>:начинаться<v>
анҷӯвҷ<v>:начинаться<v>
inǰafc<v>:начинаться<v>
инҷафц<v>:начинаться<v>
inǰafct<v>:начинаться<v>
инҷафцт<v>:начинаться<v>
inǰafctow<v>:начинаться<v>
инҷафцтоw<v>:начинаться<v>
inǰovd<v>:начинаться<v>
инҷовд<v>:начинаться<v>
inǰovǰ<v>:начинаться<v>
инҷовҷ<v>:начинаться<v>
inǰīvӡ<v>:начинаться<v>
инҷӣвӡ<v>:начинаться<v>
inǰūvd<v>:начинаться<v>
инҷӯвд<v>:начинаться<v>
inǰūvǰ<v>:начинаться<v>
инҷӯвҷ<v>:начинаться<v>
inǰūvǰ<v>:начинаться<v>
инҷӯвҷ<v>:начинаться<v>
anǰāv<v>:<v>
анҷāв<v>:<v>
anǰāven<v>:<v>
анҷāвен<v>:<v>
anǰāvet<v>:<v>
анҷāвет<v>:<v>
anǰāvum<v>:<v>
анҷāвум<v>:<v>
anǰām<v>:<v>
анҷāм<v>:<v>
anǰa<v>:<v>
анҷа<v>:<v>
anǰen<v>:<v>
анҷен<v>:<v>
anǰet<v>:<v>
анҷет<v>:<v>
anǰīvd<v>:<v>
анҷӣвд<v>:<v>
anǰīvdow<v>:<v>
анҷӣвдоw<v>:<v>
anǰūvd<v>:<v>
анҷӯвд<v>:<v>
anǰūvǰ<v>:<v>
анҷӯвҷ<v>:<v>
inǰāv<v>:<v>
инҷāв<v>:<v>
inǰāven<v>:<v>
инҷāвен<v>:<v>
inǰāvet<v>:<v>
инҷāвет<v>:<v>
inǰāvum<v>:<v>
инҷāвум<v>:<v>
inǰām<v>:<v>
инҷāм<v>:<v>
inǰa<v>:<v>
инҷа<v>:<v>
inǰīvd<v>:<v>
инҷӣвд<v>:<v>
inǰīvdow<v>:<v>
инҷӣвдоw<v>:<v>
inǰūvd<v>:<v>
инҷӯвд<v>:<v>
inǰūvǰ<v>:<v>
инҷӯвҷ<v>:<v>
anǰāv<v>:ловить<v>
анҷāв<v>:ловить<v>
anǰāven<v>:ловить<v>
анҷāвен<v>:ловить<v>
anǰāvet<v>:ловить<v>
анҷāвет<v>:ловить<v>
anǰāvum<v>:ловить<v>
анҷāвум<v>:ловить<v>
anǰām<v>:ловить<v>
анҷāм<v>:ловить<v>
anǰa<v>:ловить<v>
анҷа<v>:ловить<v>
anǰen<v>:ловить<v>
анҷен<v>:ловить<v>
anǰet<v>:ловить<v>
анҷет<v>:ловить<v>
anǰīvd<v>:ловить<v>
анҷӣвд<v>:ловить<v>
anǰīvdow<v>:ловить<v>
анҷӣвдоw<v>:ловить<v>
anǰūvd<v>:ловить<v>
анҷӯвд<v>:ловить<v>
anǰūvǰ<v>:ловить<v>
анҷӯвҷ<v>:ловить<v>
inǰāv<v>:ловить<v>
инҷāв<v>:ловить<v>
inǰāven<v>:ловить<v>
инҷāвен<v>:ловить<v>
inǰāvet<v>:ловить<v>
инҷāвет<v>:ловить<v>
inǰāvum<v>:ловить<v>
инҷāвум<v>:ловить<v>
inǰām<v>:ловить<v>
инҷāм<v>:ловить<v>
inǰa<v>:ловить<v>
инҷа<v>:ловить<v>
inǰīvd<v>:ловить<v>
инҷӣвд<v>:ловить<v>
inǰīvdow<v>:ловить<v>
инҷӣвдоw<v>:ловить<v>
inǰūvd<v>:ловить<v>
инҷӯвд<v>:ловить<v>
inǰūvǰ<v>:ловить<v>
инҷӯвҷ<v>:ловить<v>
anǰāv<v>:задерживать<v>
анҷāв<v>:задерживать<v>
anǰāven<v>:задерживать<v>
анҷāвен<v>:задерживать<v>
anǰāvet<v>:задерживать<v>
анҷāвет<v>:задерживать<v>
anǰāvum<v>:задерживать<v>
анҷāвум<v>:задерживать<v>
anǰām<v>:задерживать<v>
анҷāм<v>:задерживать<v>
anǰa<v>:задерживать<v>
анҷа<v>:задерживать<v>
anǰen<v>:задерживать<v>
анҷен<v>:задерживать<v>
anǰet<v>:задерживать<v>
анҷет<v>:задерживать<v>
anǰīvd<v>:задерживать<v>
анҷӣвд<v>:задерживать<v>
anǰīvdow<v>:задерживать<v>
анҷӣвдоw<v>:задерживать<v>
anǰūvd<v>:задерживать<v>
анҷӯвд<v>:задерживать<v>
anǰūvǰ<v>:задерживать<v>
анҷӯвҷ<v>:задерживать<v>
inǰāv<v>:задерживать<v>
инҷāв<v>:задерживать<v>
inǰāven<v>:задерживать<v>
инҷāвен<v>:задерживать<v>
inǰāvet<v>:задерживать<v>
инҷāвет<v>:задерживать<v>
inǰāvum<v>:задерживать<v>
инҷāвум<v>:задерживать<v>
inǰām<v>:задерживать<v>
инҷāм<v>:задерживать<v>
inǰa<v>:задерживать<v>
инҷа<v>:задерживать<v>
inǰīvd<v>:задерживать<v>
инҷӣвд<v>:задерживать<v>
inǰīvdow<v>:задерживать<v>
инҷӣвдоw<v>:задерживать<v>
inǰūvd<v>:задерживать<v>
инҷӯвд<v>:задерживать<v>
inǰūvǰ<v>:задерживать<v>
инҷӯвҷ<v>:задерживать<v>
anǰāv<v>:занимать_место<v>
анҷāв<v>:занимать_место<v>
anǰāven<v>:занимать_место<v>
анҷāвен<v>:занимать_место<v>
anǰāvet<v>:занимать_место<v>
анҷāвет<v>:занимать_место<v>
anǰāvum<v>:занимать_место<v>
анҷāвум<v>:занимать_место<v>
anǰām<v>:занимать_место<v>
анҷāм<v>:занимать_место<v>
anǰa<v>:занимать_место<v>
анҷа<v>:занимать_место<v>
anǰen<v>:занимать_место<v>
анҷен<v>:занимать_место<v>
anǰet<v>:занимать_место<v>
анҷет<v>:занимать_место<v>
anǰīvd<v>:занимать_место<v>
анҷӣвд<v>:занимать_место<v>
anǰīvdow<v>:занимать_место<v>
анҷӣвдоw<v>:занимать_место<v>
anǰūvd<v>:занимать_место<v>
анҷӯвд<v>:занимать_место<v>
anǰūvǰ<v>:занимать_место<v>
анҷӯвҷ<v>:занимать_место<v>
inǰāv<v>:занимать_место<v>
инҷāв<v>:занимать_место<v>
inǰāven<v>:занимать_место<v>
инҷāвен<v>:занимать_место<v>
inǰāvet<v>:занимать_место<v>
инҷāвет<v>:занимать_место<v>
inǰāvum<v>:занимать_место<v>
инҷāвум<v>:занимать_место<v>
inǰām<v>:занимать_место<v>
инҷāм<v>:занимать_место<v>
inǰa<v>:занимать_место<v>
инҷа<v>:занимать_место<v>
inǰīvd<v>:занимать_место<v>
инҷӣвд<v>:занимать_место<v>
inǰīvdow<v>:занимать_место<v>
инҷӣвдоw<v>:занимать_место<v>
inǰūvd<v>:занимать_место<v>
инҷӯвд<v>:занимать_место<v>
inǰūvǰ<v>:занимать_место<v>
инҷӯвҷ<v>:занимать_место<v>
anǰāv<v>:схватить<v>
анҷāв<v>:схватить<v>
anǰāven<v>:схватить<v>
анҷāвен<v>:схватить<v>
anǰāvet<v>:схватить<v>
анҷāвет<v>:схватить<v>
anǰāvum<v>:схватить<v>
анҷāвум<v>:схватить<v>
anǰām<v>:схватить<v>
анҷāм<v>:схватить<v>
anǰa<v>:схватить<v>
анҷа<v>:схватить<v>
anǰen<v>:схватить<v>
анҷен<v>:схватить<v>
anǰet<v>:схватить<v>
анҷет<v>:схватить<v>
anǰīvd<v>:схватить<v>
анҷӣвд<v>:схватить<v>
anǰīvdow<v>:схватить<v>
анҷӣвдоw<v>:схватить<v>
anǰūvd<v>:схватить<v>
